Tennessee, session 114, SB2546.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-211-107(c), is amended by
adding the following language immediately after the first sentence in the subsection:
The department may authorize facilities to submit the reports required by this subsection
(c) in electronic format.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2546
012175
- 1 -